Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2213
Department;
powers and duties relating to aging.

The department
shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To develop, approve, and submit to the Governor a two-year,
three-year, or four-year state plan on aging, as determined by the department,
for purposes of administering grant funds allocated to the state under the
federal Older Americans Act, as now or hereafter amended, or administering
state funds allocated to the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act;

(2) To cooperate with similar departments, commissions, or
councils in the federal government and in other states;

(3) To adopt and promulgate rules, regulations, and bylaws
governing its procedure and activities and as necessary to carry out the policies
of the department and the policies prescribed by the Administration on Aging
pursuant to the federal Older Americans Act, as now or hereafter amended;

(4) To create committees to aid in the discharge of its powers
and duties;

(5) To cooperate with and assist other state and local governmental
agencies and officials on matters relating to services for older individuals;

(6) To divide the state into planning-and-service areas as
provided in section 71-807 for behavioral health regions, except that Regions
3 and 5 may each be divided into two planning-and-service areas with boundaries
as established by the department for planning-and-service areas in existence
in those regions on July 1, 1982;

(7) To establish minimum standards for program operations
and to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the performance of area
agencies on aging and for any services provided by such area agencies on aging
which are funded in whole or in part under the Nebraska Community Aging Services
Act or the federal Older Americans Act, as now or hereafter amended;

(8) To require the submission of a one-year and a five-year
area plan and budget by each area agency on aging or agency seeking designation
as an area agency on aging. Such plans and budgets shall be submitted sixty
days prior to the start of each fiscal year in accordance with the uniform
area plan format and other instructions issued by the department;

(9) To review and approve a one-year and a five-year area
plan and budget for the support of each area agency on aging and the provision
of eligible activities and services as defined in section 81-2222;

(10) To adopt and submit electronically to the Legislature
a community aging services budget;

(11) To review the performance of each area agency on aging
and, based on the department-approved area plan and budget, to determine the
continued designation or the withdrawal of the designation of an area agency
on aging receiving or requesting resources through the state or under the
Nebraska Community Aging Services Act or the federal Older Americans Act,
as now or hereafter amended. After consultation with the director of the area
agency on aging and the governing unit of the area agency on aging, the department
may withdraw a designation when it can be shown that federal or state laws,
rules, or regulations have not been complied with, state or federal funds
are not being expended for the purposes for which they were intended, or older
individuals are not receiving appropriate services within available resources.
Withdrawal of a designation may be appealed to the department. Upon withdrawal
of a designation, the department may temporarily perform all or part of the
functions and responsibilities of the area agency on aging, may designate
another agency to perform such functions and responsibilities identified by
the department until the designation of a new area agency on aging, and, when
deemed necessary, may temporarily deliver services to assure continuity;

(12) To conduct continuing studies and analyses of the problems
faced by older individuals within the state and develop such recommendations
for administrative or legislative action as appear necessary;

(13) To develop grants and plans, enter into contracts, accept
gifts, grants, and federal funds, and do all things necessary and proper to
discharge these powers and duties;

(14) To accept and administer any other programs or resources
delegated, designated, assigned, or awarded to the department from public
or private sources; and

(15) Such other powers and
duties necessary to effectively implement the Nebraska Community Aging Services
Act.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 13;

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 15;

Laws 1993, LB 818, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 873;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 128;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 764;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 213;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 39.